Washington statutes.
RCW 37.12.050

State's jurisdiction limited by federal law.

The jurisdiction assumed pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to the limitations and provisions of the federal act of August 15, 1953 (Public Law 280, 83rd Congress, 1st Session).

[ 1957 c 240 s 5.]